Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4204
Designation of hospitals; department; duties.

The department shall designate hospitals as comprehensive stroke centers, thrombectomy-capable stroke centers, primary stroke centers, or acute stroke-ready hospitals based on certification from the American Heart Association, the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations, or another nationally recognized, guidelines-based organization that provides certification for stroke care, as such certification existed on July 19, 2018. The department shall compile and maintain a list of such hospitals and post the list on the department’s web site. Before June 1 of each year, the department shall send the list to the physician medical director of each emergency medical service licensed pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act.

Laws 2016, LB722, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 66.
July 19, 2018
Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.